Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2060
Conversion of public funds.

The conversion of public funds intended for or contributed to an undertaking authorized by section 71-2059 for the benefit of any individual shall constitute grounds for review and action by the Attorney General or the county attorney pursuant to sections 28-509 to 28-518.

Laws 1985, LB 61, § 5.